src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The LOW SAXON language verbs inflect in persons. So far only for northwestern dialects.

LEXICON V_TELLEN !! tellen:tell
!!  Orthographic variation in consonant length
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^CC2C%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^CC2C%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^CC2C%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^CC2C%>dest ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^CC2C%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^CC2C%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^CC2C%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^CC2C%>den ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^CC2C%>d ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2:%^CC2C ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;

LEXICON V_MAKEN !! maken:maak
!! Orthographic variation in marking of long vowels, perfect participle '-ed'

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^VV2V%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>dest ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>den ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^VV2V%>ed ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VV2V%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_VOELEN !! völen:vööl
!! Orthographic variation in marking of long vowels, perfect participle '-d'

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^VV2V%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>dest ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>den ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VV2V%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_KOAKEN !! koaken:koak
!! No orthographic variation in marking of long vowels or consonants, perfect participle '-ed'

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>dest ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>den ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>ed ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_WAIEN !! waien:wai
!! No orthographic variation in marking of long vowels or consonants, perfect participle '-d'

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>dest ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>den ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_SAKKEN !! sakken:sakk
!!  Orthographic variation in consonant length, perfect participle '-ed'

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^CC2C%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^CC2C%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^CC2C%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^CC2C%>dest ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^CC2C%>de ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^CC2C%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^CC2C%>den ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^CC2C%>den ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>ed ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2:%^CC2C ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_RYDEN !! ryden:r%{ei0%}%{ya0%}d
!! Strong verb class 1, 4c

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^ABL1S%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^ABL1S%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^ABL2%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^ABL3%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_BEDEN !! beden:b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d
!! Strong verb class 2

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^VV2V%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^ABL1S%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^ABL1S%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^ABL2%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^ABL3%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VV2V%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%^VV2V%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%^VV2V%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_DRINKEN !! drinken:dr%{iua%}nk
!! Strong verb class 3

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^ABL2%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^ABL3%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;

LEXICON V_WINNEN !! winnen:w%{iua%}nn
!! Strong verb class 3, stem ending with two identical consonants

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^CC2C%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^CC2C%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^CC2C%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^CC2C%^ABL2%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^CC2C%^ABL2 ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^ABL2%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^ABL3%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2:%^CC2C ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
